Washington statutes.
RCW 6.27.330

Continuing lien on earnings—Authorized.

(1) A judgment creditor may obtain a continuing lien on earnings by a garnishment pursuant to this chapter, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) A continuing lien on earnings may not be issued pursuant to this chapter if the garnishment is based on a judgment or other order for child support. A judgment creditor may seek to withhold from earnings based on a judgment or other order for child support under chapter 26.18 RCW.

[ 2021 c 35 s 4; 2012 c 159 s 13; 1987 c 442 s 1032; 1970 ex.s. c 61 s 5. Formerly RCW 7.33.350.]